Wisconsin, session 2025, SB653.
do enact as follows:SB653,11Section 1. 36.46 of the statutes is created to read:SB653,2,3236.46 Prohibitions on foreign influence. (1) Definitions. In this 3section:SB653,2,64(a) “Academic partnership” means a faculty or student exchange program, 5study abroad program, articulation program, recruiting program, or dual degree 6program.SB653,2,87(b) “Collaboration agreement” means a written statement of mutual interest 8in academic or research collaboration.SB653,2,119(c) “Foreign adversary” means a foreign government or foreign non-10government person listed as a foreign adversary in 15 CFR 791.4 (a) and also 11includes the State of Qatar.SB653,2,1212(d) “Foreign principal” means any of the following:SB653,2,13131. An official of a foreign adversary.SB653,2,15142. A political party or member of a political party associated with a foreign 15adversary.SB653,2,18163. An entity or organization organized under the laws of, or having its 17principal place of business in, a country controlled by a foreign adversary, including 18a subsidiary of such an entity or organization.SB653,3,2194. An individual who is domiciled in a country controlled by a foreign 1adversary and who is not a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United 2States.SB653,3,53(e) “Political party” means an organization or association of individuals whose 4aim or purpose is, or that is engaged in any activity devoted in whole or in part to, 5any of the following:SB653,3,761. The establishment, administration, control, or acquisition of 7administration or control of a foreign adversary.SB653,3,982. The furtherance or influencing of the political or public interest, policies, or 9relations of a foreign adversary.SB653,3,1210(f) “Prohibited business entity” means any company, other than a U.S. person, 11as defined in 15 CFR 772.1, or a U.S. subsidiary, as defined in 15 CFR 772.1, to 12which any of the following applies:SB653,3,14131. The company is primarily domiciled, incorporated, or headquartered in, or 14listed on a securities exchange in, a country controlled by a foreign adversary.SB653,3,16152. The company has its principal place of business in a country controlled by a 16foreign adversary.SB653,3,22173. The company is controlled by, or a majority of the ownership interest in the 18company is held by an entity that is controlled by, the government of the People’s 19Republic of China, the Chinese Communist Party, the Chinese military, or any 20instrumentality of the Chinese government, including the State-owned Assets 21Supervision and Administration Commission of the State Council of the National 22Social Security Fund.SB653,3,23234. The company is a subsidiary of a company described in subds. 1. to 3.SB653,4,624(g) “Research partnership” means a formal or informal agreement, contract, 1memorandum of understanding, joint project, consortium, or other collaborative 2arrangement with any college or university, including its research centers and 3laboratories, based in a country controlled by a foreign adversary, or with any 4foreign adversary or foreign principal, for the purpose of jointly conducting, 5funding, or facilitating scientific, technological, engineering, medical, social science, 6or other scholarly research.SB653,4,97(2) Foreign grants, collaboration agreements, academic partnerships, 8research partnerships, or educational software. (a) Neither the board nor 9an institution may do any of the following:SB653,4,11101. Accept any grant from a college or university based in a country controlled 11by a foreign adversary, or from a foreign adversary or foreign principal.SB653,4,14122. Except as provided in par. (b), participate in any collaboration agreement 13with a college or university based in a country controlled by a foreign adversary, or 14with a foreign adversary or foreign principal.SB653,4,18153. Except as provided in par. (b), participate in any academic partnership or 16research partnership with a college or university, or an academic or other research 17partner, based in a country controlled by a foreign adversary, or with a foreign 18adversary or foreign principal.SB653,5,219(b) 1. Subject to subds. 2. to 4., upon approval by the board, an institution may 20enter into a collaboration agreement, academic partnership, or research 21partnership with a college or university based in a country controlled by a foreign 22adversary, or with a foreign adversary or foreign principal, if the board determines 23the collaboration agreement, academic partnership, or research partnership is 1valuable to students and to the institution and is not detrimental to the safety or 2security of the United States or its residents.SB653,5,732. The board may not approve a collaboration agreement, academic 4partnership, or research partnership under subd. 1. if the collaboration agreement, 5academic partnership, or research partnership would constrain the institution’s 6freedom of contract or allow the institution’s curriculum or values to be directed or 7controlled by a foreign adversary or foreign principal.SB653,5,1283. The board may not approve a collaboration agreement, academic 9partnership, or research partnership under subd. 1. until the board requests and 10receives a national security risk assessment of the proposed collaboration 11agreement, academic partnership, or research partnership by a federal law 12enforcement agency.SB653,5,15134. In the 2025-27 fiscal biennium, neither the board nor an institution may 14enter into any collaboration agreement or academic partnership with the Russian 15Federation.SB653,5,2216(c) Neither the board nor an institution, nor a researcher employed by the 17system, may approve, continue, or enter into any collaboration agreement, 18academic partnership, or research partnership with a college or university based in 19a country controlled by a foreign adversary, or with a foreign adversary or foreign 20principal, if any project under the collaboration agreement, academic partnership, 21or research partnership is funded in full or in part by the U.S. department of 22defense or any successor organization to the U.S. department of defense.SB653,5,2423(d) The board shall adopt a policy prohibiting each institution from procuring 24or using educational software from a prohibited business entity.SB653,6,61(3) Foreign gifts and cultural exchange payments. (a) Neither the 2board nor an institution, nor any employee or representative of the system, may 3solicit or accept any gift in an official capacity, including any physical object, loan, 4reward, promise of future employment, favor, or service, from a college or university 5based in a country controlled by a foreign adversary or from a foreign adversary or 6foreign principal.SB653,6,97(b) Neither the board nor an institution may accept anything of value 8conditioned upon participation in a program or other endeavor to promote the 9language or culture of a country controlled by a foreign adversary.SB653,6,1610(4) Annual report. (a) No later than December 1, 2026, and by December 1 11of each year thereafter, the board shall submit a report to the governor and the chief 12clerk of each house of the legislature, for distribution to the legislature under s. 1313.172 (2), relating to collaboration agreements, academic partnerships, and 14research partnerships of the board or any institution with colleges and universities 15based in a country controlled by a foreign adversary or with a foreign adversary or 16foreign principal.SB653,6,1917(b) The report under par. (a) shall include, at a minimum, detailed 18information, for the immediately preceding fiscal year, with respect to all of the 19following:SB653,6,22201. Each collaboration agreement, academic partnership, or research 21partnership involving an institution and any college or university based in a 22country controlled by a foreign adversary or a foreign adversary or foreign principal.SB653,6,24232. Each office, campus, or other physical location used or maintained by an 24institution in a country controlled by a foreign adversary.SB653,7,213. The date on which any collaboration agreement, academic partnership, or 2research partnership reported under subd. 1. is expected to terminate.SB653,7,534. Each collaboration agreement, academic partnership, or research 4partnership reported under subd. 1. for which a requirement under sub. (2) (b) was 5not satisfied.SB653,7,865. Each request by the board for a national security risk assessment as 7provided in sub. (2) (b) 3. and, for each, the determination made by the federal law 8enforcement agency in response to the request.SB653,7,1196. Any other program or contract, not reported under subd. 1., between the 10board or an institution and any college or university based in a country controlled 11by a foreign adversary or a foreign adversary or foreign principal. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb653 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb653 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB653 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB653 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB653: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting